test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ЖО_Д-жена_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - жена M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      жена+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: жена́
      жена+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: жену́
      жена+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: жены́
      жена+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: жене́
      жена+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: жене́
      жена+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: жено́й
      жена+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: жёны
      жена+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Anim: жён
      жена+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: жён
      жена+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: жёнах
      жена+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: жёнам
      жена+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: жёнами
